incubator/apertium-sco/apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="ch/uise__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uise</l>       <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uise</l>       <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uises</l>      <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uised</l>      <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osen</l>       <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uisin</l>      <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uisin</l>      <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uisin</l>      <r>uise<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cl/eek__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eek</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eek</l>        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeks</l>       <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eekit</l>      <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aucht</l>      <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eekin</l>      <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eekin</l>      <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eekin</l>      <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ga/ng__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ng</l>        <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ng</l>        <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ngs</l>       <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hansel__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>led</l>       <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>led</l>       <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="boo__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'d</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'d</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="caa__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="j/imp__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>imp</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imp</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imps</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amp</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umpen</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>impin</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>impin</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>impin</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jin/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jyn/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="belang__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ken__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="big__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>git</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>git</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="boo">             <i>boo</i><par n="boo__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ken">             <i>ken</i><par n="ken__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="caa">             <i>caa</i><par n="caa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gang">              <i>ga</i><par n="ga/ng__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="belang">           <i>belang</i><par n="belang__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="big">              <i>big</i><par n="big__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brig">             <i>brig</i><par n="big__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cleek">            <i>cl</i><par n="cl/eek__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="hansel">    <i>hansel</i><par n="hansel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jimp">             <i>j</i><par n="j/imp__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jine">             <i>jyn</i><par n="jin/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jyne">             <i>jyn</i><par n="jyn/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lig">              <i>lig</i><par n="big__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stravaig">         <i>stravaig</i><par n="big__vblex"/></e>
